Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1526
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the operation and administration of the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program, including, but not limited to:

(1) Criteria, procedures, and timelines for designation of the community-based private nonprofit or for-profit agencies or public agencies that will receive funding to provide respite services under community lifespan respite services programs;

(2) A requirement that each community lifespan respite services program publicize the telephone number and address where families and caregivers may contact the program; and

(3) Procedures and guidelines for determining priorities, eligibility standards, and eligibility criteria for the selection of caregivers to participate in programs funded under the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program.

Laws 1999, LB 148, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 692, § 1.